apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_adv_preadv_cnj.en.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="iso-8859-1"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="comp"/>
    <sdef n="detnt"/>
    <sdef n="predet"/>
    <sdef n="atn"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>
    <sdef n="obj"/>
    <sdef n="subj"/>
    <sdef n="pro"/>
    <sdef n="tn"/>
    <sdef n="acr"/>
    <sdef n="loc"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="al"/>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="nn"/>
    <sdef n="an"/>
    <sdef n="aa"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="ger"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="pri"/>
    <sdef n="ifi"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>
    <sdef n="fti"/>
    <sdef n="cni"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>
    <sdef n="pis"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="ij"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"/>
    <sdef n="web"/>
    <sdef n="guio"/>
  </sdefs>


 <pardefs>

<!--Paradigmes de números i signes puntuació -->

<pardef n="guionet">
    
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>-</l>
          <r>-<s n="guio"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="coma">
    
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>,</l>
         <r>,<s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="numeros">
    
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
    
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

     <pardef n="separ">
    
      <e>
        <re>[¿¡]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lquest"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
    
      <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
    
      <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>



 <pardef n="maybe__adv">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="very__preadv">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="preadv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="and__cnjcoo">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="after__cnjadv">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="that__cnjsub">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 </pardefs>

<e lm="badly"><i>badly</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="high"><i>high</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="now"><i>now</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="then"><i>then</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="a long while"><i>a<b/>long<b/>while</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="alike"><i>alike</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="along these lines"><i>along<b/>these<b/>lines</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="as a matter of course"><i>as<b/>a<b/>matter<b/>of<b/>course</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="as things stand"><i>as<b/>things<b/>stand</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="at an all-time low"><i>at<b/>an<b/>all-time<b/>low</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="at issue"><i>at<b/>issue</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="at the crack of dawn"><i>at<b/>the<b/>crack<b/>of<b/>dawn</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="at the very end"><i>at<b/>the<b/>very<b/>end</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="below sea level"><i>below<b/>sea<b/>level</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="by check"><i>by<b/>check</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="by proxy"><i>by<b/>proxy</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="closely"><i>closely</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="during the summer"><i>during<b/>the<b/>summer</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="ex aequo"><i>ex<b/>aequo</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="for control purposes"><i>for<b/>control<b/>purposes</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="in vain"><i>in<b/>vain</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="forte"><i>forte</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="from place to place"><i>from<b/>place<b/>to<b/>place</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="from this day forth"><i>from<b/>this<b/>day<b/>forth</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="hardly"><i>hardly</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="if required"><i>if<b/>required</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="in a southwardly direction"><i>in<b/>a<b/>southwardly<b/>direction</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="in blocks"><i>in<b/>blocks</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="in days to come"><i>in<b/>days<b/>to<b/>come</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="in extremis"><i>in<b/>extremis</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="in its entirety"><i>in<b/>its<b/>entirety</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="in old times"><i>in<b/>old<b/>times</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="in retrospect"><i>in<b/>retrospect</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="in sum"><i>in<b/>sum</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="in the foreseeable future"><i>in<b/>the<b/>foreseeable<b/>future</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="in the nick of time"><i>in<b/>the<b/>nick<b/>of<b/>time</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="in the winter"><i>in<b/>the<b/>winter</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="incognito"><i>incognito</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="just now"><i>just<b/>now</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="like clockwork"><i>like<b/>clockwork</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="most of the fall"><i>most<b/>of<b/>the<b/>fall</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="northeast"><i>northeast</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="of little moment"><i>of<b/>little<b/>moment</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="on a mass scale"><i>on<b/>a<b/>mass<b/>scale</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="on foot"><i>on<b/>foot</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="on site"><i>on<b/>site</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="on the never-never"><i>on<b/>the<b/>never-never</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="on top"><i>on<b/>top</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="onward"><i>onward</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="out of step"><i>out<b/>of<b/>step</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="precisely"><i>precisely</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="roundly"><i>roundly</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="so far"><i>so<b/>far</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="supra"><i>supra</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="the world over"><i>the<b/>world<b/>over</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="through word of mouth"><i>through<b/>word<b/>of<b/>mouth</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="to no effect"><i>to<b/>no<b/>effect</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="to this day"><i>to<b/>this<b/>day</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="under discussion"><i>under<b/>discussion</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="up there"><i>up<b/>there</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="way up"><i>way<b/>up</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="with a laugh"><i>with<b/>a<b/>laugh</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="with supreme indifference"><i>with<b/>supreme<b/>indifference</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="without prejudice"><i>without<b/>prejudice</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="affectionately"><i>affectionately</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="commonly"><i>commonly</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="disconcertingly"><i>disconcertingly</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="extraordinarily"><i>extraordinarily</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="gladly"><i>gladly</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="increasingly"><i>increasingly</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="later"><i>later</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="mysteriously"><i>mysteriously</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="publicly"><i>publicly</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="theoretically"><i>theoretically</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="warily"><i>warily</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="any"><i>any</i><par n="very__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="as"><i>as</i><par n="very__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="just as"><i>just<b/>as</i><par n="very__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="more"><i>more</i><par n="very__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="most"><i>most</i><par n="very__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="quite" c="potser seria adverbi, no?"><i>quite</i><par n="very__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="so"><i>so</i><par n="very__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="too"><i>too</i><par n="very__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="very"><i>very</i><par n="very__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="fairly"><i>fairly</i><par n="very__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="after"><i>after</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="although"><i>although</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="and"><i>and</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="as"><i>as</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="as if"><i>as<b/>if</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="as well as"><i>as<b/>well<b/>as</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="because"><i>because</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="before"><i>before</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="both"><i>both</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="but"><i>but</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="but rather"><i>but<b/>rather</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="either"><i>either</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="for"><i>for</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="for instance"><i>for<b/>instance</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="if"><i>if</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="neither"><i>neither</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="nor"><i>nor</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="once"><i>once</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="or"><i>or</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="since"><i>since</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="so"><i>so</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="so that"><i>so<b/>that</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="than"><i>than</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="that"><i>that</i><par n="that__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="though"><i>though</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="unless"><i>unless</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="until"><i>until</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="when"><i>when</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="where"><i>where</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="whether"><i>whether</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="while"><i>while</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="yet"><i>yet</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="for example"><i>for<b/>example</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="the same as"><i>the<b/>same<b/>as</i><par n="that__cnjsub"/></e>
      <e>
        <par n="separa"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="numeros"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="coma"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="paresq"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="pardret"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="separ"/>
      </e>
   <e>
        <par n="guionet"/>
      </e>
